Maryland, session 2025, SB0501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0501*

SENATE BILL 501
21–809.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (4) of this
subsection, an agency shall mail to an owner liable under subsection (c) of this section a
citation that shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(ii) The registration number of the motor vehicle involved in the
violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) The location where the violation occurred;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty should be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
employed by or under contract with an agency that, based on inspection of recorded images,
the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of this subtitle;
(ix) A statement that recorded images are evidence of a violation of
this subtitle;
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the citation may be contested
in the District Court; [and]

SENATE BILL 501 3
(xi) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section that failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability in a timely manner:
1. Is an admission of liability;
2. May result in the refusal by the Administration to register
the motor vehicle; and
3. May result in the suspension of the motor vehicle
registration; AND
(XII) FOR A CITATION GENERATED BY A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM LOCATED IN BALTIMORE CITY, INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON
ALLEGED TO BE LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR TO CONTEST LIABILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY RESULT IN THE ASSESSMENT OF A LATE FEE.
(6) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(II) AN AGENCY MAY CHARGE A LATE FEE IF A PERSON ALLEGED
TO BE LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION FAILS TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY WITHIN A TIMEFRAME DETERMINED BY THE AGENCY.
[(6)] (7) To mail the citation or warning notice, an agency shall use:
(i) The current mailing address on file with the Administration; or
(ii) If a mailing address is unavailable, the current residential
address on file with the Administration.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.